Utah statutes.
53A-17a-155.    Appropriation for library books and electronic resources.
(1)  The State Board of Education shall distribute monies appropriated in
Section 53A-17a-104 for library books and electronic resources as follows:
(a)  25% shall be divided equally among all public schools; and
(b)  75% shall be divided among public schools based on each school's average
daily membership as compared to the total average daily membership.
(2)  A school district or charter school may not use monies distributed under
Subsection (1) to supplant other monies used to purchase library books or
electronic resources.
